Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.32.020

Investment in federal home loan bank stock or bonds.

Any savings and loan association, building and loan association, bank, savings bank, or mutual savings bank may become a member of and invest its funds in the bonds and/or the capital stock of a federal home loan bank, and vote such stock in the manner prescribed by its board of directors.

[ 2014 c 37 s 201; 1955 c 33 s 30.32.020. Prior: 1933 c 105 s 1; RRS s 3294-1. Formerly RCW 30.32.020.]